Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1185.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 9, chapter 4, article 8, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 9-500.54, to read: START_STATUTE9-500.54. Public notices; publication; errors; omissions; definition A. Notwithstanding any other law, an error or omission in a public notice that is required under this title to be published does not invalidate the notice.  The public body that is required to publish the notice may proceed with the matter that is the SUBJECT OF the public notice if both of the following apply: 1. The public body that is required to publish the public notice posts a corrected notice on the public body's official website. 2. The corrected public notice is published at least five days before a hearing that is the subject of the public notice. B. If a public body posts a corrected public notice pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 1 of this section, the public body is not required to republish the corrected public notice. C. For the purposes of this section, "public body" has the same meaning prescribed in section 39-121.01. END_STATUTE